Utah statutes.
76-8-301.   Interference with public servant.

(1)  A person is guilty of interference with a public servant if he:

(a)  uses force, violence, intimidation, or engages in any other unlawful act with a purpose to interfere with a public servant performing or purporting to perform an official function; or

(b)  knowingly or intentionally interferes with the lawful service of process by a public servant.

(2)  Interference with a public servant is a class B misdemeanor.

(3)  For purposes of this section, "public servant" does not include jurors.

